Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4710
Rates and charges.

The rates and charges shall be reasonable in relation to the services provided. The director may request a statement from the prepaid limited health service organization describing the appropriateness of the rates and charges.

Laws 1989, LB 320, § 10.